Vermont, session 2025-2026, H676.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. MAINTAINING PATIENT ACCESS TO ANIMAL-DERIVED
THYROID MEDICATIONS; REPORT
VT LEG #386207 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.676
2026 Page 2 of 2
(a) The Office of Professional Regulation, in consultation with the
Department of Financial Regulation; representatives of health care
professionals, of health insurers, and of patients with hypothyroidism and other
thyroid-related disorders; and other interested stakeholders, shall consider all
options for ensuring that animal-derived thyroid medications, including
desiccated thyroid extract, continue to be available to patients in Vermont for
whom those medications are more effective or better tolerated than synthetic
thyroid medications. The Office of Professional Regulation and the
Department of Financial Regulation shall promptly implement all feasible
options that do not require legislative action.
(b) On or before January 15, 2027, the Office of Professional Regulation
shall report its findings and recommendations, including options already
implemented and any that require legislative action, to the House Committee
on Health Care and the Senate Committee on Health and Welfare.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #386207 v.1